Washington statutes.
RCW 42.23.050

Prohibited contracts void—Penalties for violation of chapter.

Any contract made in violation of the provisions of this chapter is void and the performance thereof, in full or in part, by a contracting party shall not be the basis of any claim against the municipality. Any officer violating the provisions of this chapter is liable to the municipality of which he or she is an officer for a penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars, in addition to such other civil or criminal liability or penalty as may otherwise be imposed upon the officer by law.

In addition to all other penalties, civil or criminal, the violation by any officer of the provisions of this chapter may be grounds for forfeiture of his or her office.

[ 1999 c 261 s 4; 1961 c 268 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1999 c 261: See note following RCW 42.23.030.